Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 17. State Militia

§ 1. Of whom militia constituted.

The militia of the state shall consist of all able-bodied qualified residents of the state, and those nonresidents who are accepted into service, between the ages of seventeen (17) and seventy (70) years; except those exempted by the law of the United States or of the state. But all residents having scruples of conscience averse to bearing arms shall be excused therefrom upon conditions as shall be prescribed by law. (As amended by Laws 1999, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, § 1.)

Cross references. —

As to right to bear arms, see art. 1, § 24, Wyo. Const.

For provision that military shall be subordinate to civil power, see art. 1, § 25, Wyo. Const.

As to exemption of electors from military duty, see art. 6, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For other provisions concerning defense forces and affairs generally, see title 19.

Amendments. —

Laws 1999, Senate Joint Resolutions No. 3, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was approved by vote of the people at the general election held November 7, 2000, and declared in effect November 15, 2000.

The 1999 amendment rewrote the section to change eligibility requirements so that any qualified resident between the ages of 17 and 70 and any nonresident who meets certain other requirements may serve in the state militia.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Legislature to provide for enrollment, equipment and discipline.

The legislature shall provide by law for the enrollment, equipment and discipline of the militia to conform as nearly as practicable to the regulations for the government of the armies of the United States.

Act fixing salaries of members of national guard during encampments

was not a continuing appropriation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 3. How officers commissioned.

All militia officers shall be commissioned by the governor, the manner of their selection to be provided by law, and may hold their commission for such period of time as the legislature may provide.

§ 4. Flags.

No military organization under the laws of the state shall carry any banner or flag representing any sect or society or the flag of any nationality but that of the United States.

§ 5. Governor to be commander-in-chief; powers.

The governor shall be commander-in-chief of all the military forces of the state, and shall have power to call out the militia to preserve the public peace, to execute the laws of the state, to suppress insurrection or repel invasion.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning powers and duties of governor as commander-in-chief of the military forces of the state, see art. 4, § 4, Wyo. Const., and §

19-9-101

.